New York, session 2025-2026, S4931.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Persons employed by the Erie county sheriff's office serving as 4 reserve deputies; provided, however, that nothing in this subdivision 5 shall be deemed to authorize such officer to carry, possess, repair or 6 dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor has been 7 issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09652-01-5